Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.516

Unsettled demand for payment—Proceeding—Parties—Appraisers.

(1) If a demand for payment under RCW 25.15.491 remains unsettled, the limited liability company must commence a proceeding within sixty days after receiving the payment demand and petition the court to determine the fair value of the dissenting member's interest in the limited liability company, and accrued interest. If the limited liability company does not commence the proceeding within the sixty-day period, it must pay each dissenter whose demand remains unsettled the amount demanded.

(2) The limited liability company must commence the proceeding in the superior court of the county where the limited liability company's principal office or, if none in this state, its registered office is located.

(3) The limited liability company must make all dissenters, whether or not residents of this state, whose demands remain unsettled parties to the proceeding as in an action against their membership interests in the limited liability company and all parties must be served with a copy of the petition. Nonresidents may be served by registered or certified mail or by publication as provided by law.

(4) The limited liability company may join as a party to the proceeding any member who claims to be a dissenter but who has not, in the opinion of the limited liability company, complied with the provisions of this article. If the court determines that such member has not complied with the provisions of this article, the member must be dismissed as a party.

(5) The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced is plenary and exclusive. The court may appoint one or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend decisions on the question of fair value. The appraisers have the powers described in the order appointing them or in any amendment to it. The dissenters are entitled to the same discovery rights as parties in other civil proceedings.

(6) Each dissenter made a party to the proceeding is entitled to judgment for the amount, if any, by which the court finds the fair value of the dissenter's membership interest in the limited liability company, plus interest, exceeds the amount paid by the limited liability company.

[ 2015 c 188 s 99.]